Missouri, session 2026, HB2998.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 226 and 620, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 226.1205 and 620.070, to read as follows:
226.1205. 1. The department of transportation shall conduct a feasibility study
on potential improvements to the upper Mississippi river basin, which shall include
evaluation of the following:
(1) Increasing the navigation season on the Mississippi river to twelve-month
navigation;
(2) Upgrading the existing locks to one-thousand-two-hundred-foot locks; and
(3) Adding hydropower on existing locks and dams.
2. The department shall report the findings of the study to the general assembly
no later than December 1, 2029.
620.070. 1. There is hereby established in the department of economic
development the "Rural Development Office", which shall have the purpose and duty to
advocate for and promote rural Missouri and focus on efforts designed to aid rural
improvements.
2. The rural development office shall:
(1) Build and foster collaborative partnerships and networks of individuals and
organizations to improve the coordination and effectiveness of federal, state, and other
programs, services, and actions affecting rural areas in this state;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2998 2
(2) Serve as a liaison to federal, state, and local governmental agencies to ensure
that programs affecting rural Missourians are effectively utilized and that benefits are
available to all rural residents;
(3) Advocate on behalf of the state's rural communities;
(4) Promote community-based problem-solving strategies;
(5) Advise the governor, agencies, organizations, and other entities on issues
affecting rural communities;
(6) Serve as a resource for private and nonprofit organizations on rural issues,
programs, and available sources of technical and financial assistance; and
(7) Conduct surveys of need and report on the needs of rural Missourians in the
following areas:
(a) Housing;
(b) Child care and early childhood education;
(c) Broadband infrastructure;
(d) Health care and wellness;
(e) Workforce development; and
(f) Community development.
3. The department of economic development shall provide administrative
support and staff as deemed necessary to assist the rural development office.
✔